Missouri, session 2026, HB2864.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 513.430, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 513.430, to read as follows:
513.430. 1. The following property shall be exempt from attachment and execution
to the extent of any person's interest therein:
(1) Household furnishings, household goods, wearing apparel, appliances, books,
animals, crops or musical instruments that are held primarily for personal, family or
household use of such person or a dependent of such person, not to exceed three thousand
dollars in value in the aggregate;
(2) A wedding ring not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in value and other
jewelry held primarily for the personal, family or household use of such person or a
dependent of such person, not to exceed five hundred dollars in value in the aggregate;
(3) Any other property of any kind, not to exceed in value six hundred dollars in the
aggregate;
(4) Any implements or professional books or tools of the trade of such person or the
trade of a dependent of such person not to exceed three thousand dollars in value in the
aggregate;
(5) Any motor vehicles, not to exceed three thousand dollars in value in the
aggregate;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2864 2
(6) Any mobile home used as the principal residence but not attached to real property
in which the debtor has a fee interest, not to exceed five thousand dollars in value;
(7) Any one or more unmatured life insurance contracts owned by such person, other
than a credit life insurance contract, and up to fifteen thousand dollars of any matured life
insurance proceeds for actual funeral, cremation, or burial expenses where the deceased is the
spouse, child, or parent of the beneficiary;
(8) The amount of any accrued dividend or interest under, or loan value of, any one or
more unmatured life insurance contracts owned by such person under which the insured is
such person or an individual of whom such person is a dependent; provided, however, that if
proceedings under Title 11 of the United States Code are commenced by or against such
person, the amount exempt in such proceedings shall not exceed in value one hundred fifty
thousand dollars in the aggregate less any amount of property of such person transferred by
the life insurance company or fraternal benefit society to itself in good faith if such transfer is
to pay a premium or to carry out a nonforfeiture insurance option and is required to be so
transferred automatically under a life insurance contract with such company or society that
was entered into before commencement of such proceedings. No amount of any accrued
dividend or interest under, or loan value of, any such life insurance contracts shall be exempt
from any claim for child support. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, no such amount
shall be exempt in such proceedings under any such insurance contract which was purchased
by such person within one year prior to the commencement of such proceedings;
(9) Professionally prescribed health aids for such person or a dependent of such
person;
(10) Such person's right to receive:
(a) A Social Security benefit, unemployment compensation or a public assistance
benefit;
(b) A veteran's benefit;
(c) A disability, illness or unemployment benefit;
(d) Alimony, support or separate maintenance, not to exceed seven hundred fifty
dollars a month;
(e) a. Any payment under a stock bonus plan, pension plan, disability or death benefit
plan, profit-sharing plan, nonpublic retirement plan or any plan described, defined, or
established pursuant to section 456.014, the person's right to a participant account in any
deferred compensation program offered by the state of Missouri or any of its political
subdivisions, or annuity or similar plan or contract on account of illness, disability, death, age
or length of service, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of such person and any
dependent of such person unless:

HB 2864 3
(i) Such plan or contract was established by or under the auspices of an insider that
employed such person at the time such person's rights under such plan or contract arose;
(ii) Such payment is on account of age or length of service; and
(iii) Such plan or contract does not qualify under Section 401(a), 403(a), 403(b), 408,
408A or 409 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, (26 U.S.C. Section 401(a),
403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A or 409).
b. Notwithstanding the exemption provided in subparagraph a. of this paragraph, any
such payment to any person shall be subject to attachment or execution pursuant to a qualified
domestic relations order, as defined by Section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
(26 U.S.C. Section 414(p)), as amended, issued by a court in any proceeding for dissolution
of marriage or legal separation or a proceeding for disposition of property following
dissolution of marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse
or lacked jurisdiction to dispose of marital property at the time of the original judgment of
dissolution;
(f) Any money or assets, payable to a participant or beneficiary from, or any interest
of any participant or beneficiary in, a retirement plan, profit-sharing plan, health savings plan,
or similar plan, including an inherited account or plan, that is qualified under Section 401(a),
403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A or 409 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section
401(a), 403(a), 403(b), 408, 408A, or 409), as amended, whether such participant's or
beneficiary's interest arises by inheritance, designation, appointment, or otherwise, except as
provided in this paragraph. Any plan or arrangement described in this paragraph shall not be
exempt from the claim of an alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order or an
assignee under a final judgment of dissolution of marriage or legal separation; however,
the interest of any and all alternate payees under a qualified domestic relations order, or an
assignee under a final judgment of dissolution of marriage or legal separation, shall be
exempt from any and all claims of any creditor, other than the state of Missouri through its
department of social services, as of the time the interest is awarded or received, and
continues to be exempt thereafter. As used in this paragraph, the terms "alternate payee"
and "qualified domestic relations order" have the meaning given to them in Section 414(p) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Section 414(p)), as amended. If proceedings
under Title 11 of the United States Code are commenced by or against such person, no
amount of funds shall be exempt in such proceedings under any such plan, contract, or trust
which is fraudulent as defined in subsection 2 of section 428.024 and for the period such
person participated within three years prior to the commencement of such proceedings. For
the purposes of this section, when the fraudulently conveyed funds are recovered and after,
such funds shall be deducted and then treated as though the funds had never been contributed
to the plan, contract, or trust;

HB 2864 4
(11) The debtor's right to receive, or property that is traceable to, a payment on
account of the wrongful death of an individual of whom the debtor was a dependent, to the
extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor;
(12) Firearms, firearm accessories, and ammunition, not to exceed one thousand five
hundred dollars in value in the aggregate;
(13) Any moneys accruing to and deposited in individual savings accounts or
individual deposit accounts under sections 166.400 to 166.456 or sections 166.500 to
166.529, subject to the following provisions:
(a) This subdivision shall apply to any proceeding that:
a. Is filed on or after January 1, 2022; or
100 b. Was filed before January 1, 2022, and is pending or on appeal after January 1,
101 2022;
102 (b) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subdivision, if the designated
103 beneficiary of an individual savings account or individual deposit account established under
104 sections 166.400 to 166.456 or sections 166.500 to 166.529 is a lineal descendant of the
105 account owner, all moneys in the account shall be exempt from any claims of creditors of the
106 account owner or designated beneficiary;
107 (c) The provisions of paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall not apply to:
108 a. Claims of any creditor of an account owner as to amounts contributed within a two-
109 year period preceding the date of the filing of a bankruptcy petition under 11 U.S.C. Section
110 101 et seq., as amended; or
111 b. Claims of any creditor of an account owner as to amounts contributed within a one-
112 year period preceding an execution on judgment for such claims against the account owner.
113 2. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to exempt from attachment or execution
114 for a valid judicial or administrative order for the payment of child support or maintenance
115 any money or assets, payable to a participant or beneficiary from, or any interest of any
116 participant or beneficiary in, a retirement plan which is qualified pursuant to Sections 408 and
117 408A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sections 408 and 408A), as amended.
✔